Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5885.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-7-14.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-7 entitled "Retail
Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-7-14.2. Class P licenses — Caterers.
(a) A caterer licensed by the department of health and the division of taxation shall be
eligible to apply for a Class P license from the department of business regulation. The department
of business regulation is authorized to issue all caterers’ licenses. The license will be valid
throughout this state as a state license and no further license will be required or tax imposed by any
city or town upon this alcoholic beverage privilege. Each caterer to which the license is issued shall
pay to the department of business regulation an annual fee of five hundred dollars ($500) for the
license, which fees are paid into the state treasury. The department is authorized to promulgate
rules and regulations for the implementation of this license. In promulgating said rules, the
department shall include, but is not limited to, the following standards:
(1) Proper identification will be required for individuals who look thirty (30) years old or
younger and who are ordering alcoholic beverages;
(2) Only valid ID’s as defined by these titles are acceptable;
(3) An individual may not be served more than two (2) drinks at a time;
(4) Licensees, their agents, or employees will not serve visibly intoxicated individuals;
(5) Licensees may only serve alcoholic beverages for no more than a five-hour (5) period
per event;

(6) Only a licensee, or its employees, may serve alcoholic beverages at the event;
(7) The licensee will deliver and remove alcoholic beverages to the event, unless provided
by the event host at their residence and the alcohol is under the control of the caterer for the entire
period of time the caterer is onsite; and
(8) No shots or triple alcoholic drinks will be served.
(b) Any bartender employed by the licensee shall be certified by a nationally recognized
alcohol beverage server training program.
(c) The licensee shall purchase at retail or wholesale all alcoholic beverages from a licensed
Class A alcohol retail or wholesale establishment which is located in the state, provided, however,
any licensee who also holds a Class B license, issued pursuant to the provisions of § 3-7-7, shall be
allowed to purchase alcoholic beverages at wholesale. Wholesalers may refuse to fulfill orders
permitted under this section, or may set minimum quantities or dollar values per order. Any person
violating this section shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500) for this violation and shall be subject
to license revocation. The provisions of this section shall be enforced in accordance with this title.
(d) Violation of subsection (a) of this section is punishable upon conviction by a fine of
not more than five hundred dollars ($500). Fines imposed under this section shall be paid to the
department of business regulation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001749
========
LC001749 - Page 2 of 3